Hawaii statutes.
§329-22 Schedule V. (a) The
controlled substances listed in this section are included in schedule V.

(b)
Narcotic drugs containing nonnarcotic active medicinal ingredients. Any
compound, mixture, or preparation containing limited quantities of any of the
following narcotic drugs, which also contains one or more nonnarcotic active
medicinal ingredients in sufficient proportion to confer upon the compound,
mixture, or preparation, valuable medicinal qualities other than those
possessed by the narcotic drug alone:

(1) Not more than 200 milligrams of codeine, or any
of its salts, per 100 milliliters or per 100 grams;

(2) Not more than
100 milligrams of dihydrocodeine, or any of its salts, per 100 milliliters or
per 100 grams;

(3) Not more than
100 milligrams of ethylmorphine, or any of its salts, per 100 milliliters or
per 100 grams;

(4) Not more than
2.5 milligrams of diphenoxylate and not less than 25 micrograms of atropine
sulfate per dosage unit;

(5) Not more than
100 milligrams of opium per 100 milliliters or per 100 grams; and

(6) Not more than
0.5 milligram of difenoxin and not less than 25 micrograms of atropine sulfate
per dosage unit.

(c) Stimulants.
Unless specifically exempted or excluded or unless listed in another schedule,
any material, compound, mixture, or preparation that contains any quantity of
the following substances having a stimulant effect on the central nervous
system, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers.

(d) Depressants.
Unless specifically exempted or excluded or unless listed in another schedule,
any material, compound, mixture, or preparation that contains any quantity of
the following substances having a depressant effect on the central nervous
system, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers:

(1) Lacosamide
[(R)-2-acetoamido-N-benzyl-3-methoxy-propionamide], (Vimpat); and

(2) Pregabalin [(S)-3-(aminomethyl)-5-methylhexanoic
acid]. [L 1972, c 10, pt of §1; am L 1978, c 68, §6; am L 1985, c 150, §4; am L
2003, c 151, §6; am L 2008, c 119, §6; am L 2010, c 123, §4]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next